Utah statutes.
10-2-703.   Publication of notice of election.

(1)  Immediately after setting the date for the election, the court shall order for publication notice of the:

(a)  petition; and

(b)  date the election is to be held to determine the question of dissolution.

(2)  The notice described in Subsection (1) shall be published:

(a) (i)  for at least once a week for a period of one month in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality; or

(ii)  if there is not a newspaper as described in Subsection (2)(a), by posting in at least three public places in the municipality; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for one month.

